en: mixture of palm oil and palm superolein
hr: mješavina palminog ulja i palminog superoleina
it: miscela di olio di palma e superoleina di palma

en: palm stearin, palm stearin vegetable oil
da: palme stearin
de: Palmstearin
fi: palmusteariini
fr: Stéarine de palme
hr: palmin stearin
hu: pálmasztearin
it: Stearina di palma
nl: Palmstearine
no: palm stearin
pl: stearyna palmowa
sv: palmstearin

en: palm fat
bg: палмова мазнина
ca: greix de palma, greix vegetal de palma
cs: palmový tuk
da: palmfedtstof, palmefedtstof, palmefedt
de: Palmfett
el: λίπος φοίνικα
es: grasa de palma, grasa vegetal de palma, manteca de palma
et: palmirasv
fi: palmurasva, palmun rasva
fr: graisse de palme, graisse végétale de palme, matière grasse de palme, matière grasse végétale de palme, Acides gras de palme
he: שומן דקלים
hr: palmina mast, mast palmine koštice, palmina biljna mast, palmine biljne masti
hu: pálmazsír
it: grasso di palma, grasso vegetale di palma
lt: palmių riebalai
lv: palmu tauki
nb: palmefett
nl: palmvet
pl: tłuszcz palmowy, tłuszcz roślinny palmowy, tłuszcze roślinne palmowy
pt: gordura de palma, gordura vegetal de palma, lípido de palma, lípido vegetal de palma
ro: grăsime de palmier, grăsime vegetală de palmier
ru: Пальмовый жир
se: palmina mast
sk: palmový tuk
sl: palmina rastlinska maščoba
sr: palmina mast
sv: palmfett

en: hydrogenated palm fat
bg: хидрогенирана палмова мазнина
da: hydrogeneret palmefedt
es: grasa de palma hidrogenada
fi: kovetettu palmurasva
fr: graisse de palme hydrogénée
hr: hidrogenirana palmina mast
it: grasso di palma idrogenato
nb: hydrogenert palmefett
nl: Gehydrogeneerd palmvet
pl: utwardzony tłuszcz palmowy, tłuszcz palmowy utwardzony, tłuszcze roślinne palmowy utwardzony
sv: hydrerad palmfett

en: totally hydrogenated palm fat
bg: напълно хидрогенирана палмова мазнина
da: helt hærdet palmefedt, helt hærdet palmefedtstof
de: vollständig gehärtetes Palmfett, Palmfett ganz gehärtet
es: grasa de palma totalmente hidrogenada
fi: kokonaan kovetettu palmurasva, kokonaan kovetettua palmurasvaa, kokonaan hydrogenoitu palmurasva
fr: graisse de palme totalement hydrogénée
hr: potpuno hidrogenizirana palmina mast
hu: teljes mértékben hidrogénezett pálmazsír, teljesen hidrogénezett pálmazsír, teljes mértékben hidrogénezett pálmamag-zsír
it: grasso di palma totalmente idrogenato
nb: fullhydrogenert palmefett
nl: volledig geharde palm, geheel gehard palmvet
pl: całkowicie uwodorniony tłuszcz palmowy, całkowicie utwardzony tłuszcz palmowy
sv: fullhärdat palmfett

en: non-hydrogenated palm oil
bg: нехидрогенирано палмово масло
de: ungehärtetes Palmöl, Palmöl ungehärtet, nicht-hydriertes Palmöl
es: aceite de palma no hidrogenado
fi: kovettamaton palmuöljy, hydrogenoimaton palmuöljy
fr: huile de palme non hydrogénée
hr: nehidrogenirano palmino ulje
hu: nem hidrogénezett pálmaolaj
it: olio di palma non idrogenato
nl: niet-gehydrogeneerde palm, niet gehydrogeneerde palmolie
pl: nieutwardzony olej palmowy

en: hydrogenated palm oil
bg: хидрогенирано палмово масло
de: gehärtetes Palmöl
es: aceite de palma hidrogenado
fi: kovetettu palmuöljy, hydrogenoitu palmuöljy
fr: huile de palme hydrogénée
hu: hidrogénezett pálmaolaj
it: olio di palma idrogenato
nb: hydrogenert palmeolje
nl: gehydrogeneerde palmolie
pl: uwodorniony olej palmowy, utwardzony olej palmowy

en: totally hydrogenated palm oil
bg: напълно хидрогенирано палмово масло
de: vollständig gehärtetes Palmöl
es: aceite de palma totalmente hidrogenado
fi: kokonaan kovetettu palmuöljy, kokonaan hydrogenoitu palmuöljy
fr: huile de palme totalement hydrogénée, palme totalement hydrogénée
hr: potpuno hidrogenirano palmino ulje
hu: teljes mértékben hidrogénezett pálmaolaj, teljesen hidrogénezett pálmaolaj, teljes mértékben hidrogénezett pálmamag-olaj
it: olio di palma totalmente idrogenato
nb: fullhydrogenert palmeolje
nl: geheel geharde palm, geheel geharde palmolie
pl: całkowicie utwardzony olej palmowy, olej roślinny palmowy całkowicie utwardzony
ro: unt de palmier complet hidrogenat
sl: popolnoma hidrogenirano palmino olje
sv: helt hydrerad palmolja

en: partially hydrogenated palm oil
bg: частично хидрогенирано палмово масло, частично хидрогенирана палмова мазнина
de: teilgehärtetes Palmöl, teilweise hydriertes Palmöl, teilweise gehärtetes Palmöl
es: Aceite de palma parcialmente hidrogenado
fi: osittain kovetettu palmuöljy, osittain hydrogenoitu palmuöljy
fr: huile de palme partiellement hydrogénée
hr: djelomično hidrogenirano palmino ulje
hu: részben hidrogénezett pálmaolaj, részlegesen hidrogénezett pálmaolaj
it: Olio di palma parzialmente idrogenato
nl: gedeeltelijk geharde palmolie
pl: częściowo utwardzony olej palmowy, olej roślinny palmowy częściowo utwardzony
ro: ulei de palmier parţial hidrogenat

en: palm kernel oil, palm kernel, palm kernel vegetable oil
bg: масло от палмови ядки
bs: Ulje palminog jezgra
ca: palmist, Oli de palmist, oli vegetal de palmist
cs: palmojádrový olej
da: palmekerneolie, palmekerne olie, palmekerne
de: Palmkernöl, Palmkern
es: aceite de palmiste, palmiste, aceite de nuez de palma, aceite vegetal de palmiste
et: palmituuma
eu: Palmiste olio
fa: روغن هسته پالم
fi: palmuydinöljy, palmunydinöljy, palmuydin, palmunydin, palmunsiemenöljy
fr: huile de palmiste, huile végétale de palmiste, palmiste
hr: ulje palminih koštica, palmine koštice, palminih koštica, ulja palminih koštica, palmina koštica
hu: pálmamagolaj, pálmamag
id: Minyak inti kelapa sawit
is: pálmakjarmaolía
it: olio di palmisto, palmisto
kn: ಪಾಮ್ ಕೆರ್ನಲ್ ಎಣ್ಣೆ
ln: Mafúta ma ndiká
lt: Alyvpalmių sėklų aliejus, palmių branduolių
lv: palmu kauliņu eļļa
ms: Minyak isirong sawit
nb: palmekjerneolje, palmekjerne
nl: Palmkernolie, palmpit, palmpitolie
pl: olej z ziaren palmowych, olej roślinny z ziaren palmowych, oleje roślinne z ziaren palmowych
pt: óleo de palmiste, palmiste
ro: sâmburi de palmier
ru: Пальмоядровое масло
sv: palmkärnolja, palmkärna, palmkärn
te: పామ్‌కెర్నల్‌ నూనె
uk: Пальмоядрова олія

en: palm kernel fat
cs: palmojádrový tuk
de: Palmkernfett
es: Grasa de palmiste
fi: palmuydinrasva
fr: graisse de palmiste, matière grasse de palmiste, acides gras de palmiste, graisse végétale de palmiste, matière grasse végétale de palmiste
hr: mast palminih koštica
hu: pálmamagzsír, pálmamag-zsír, pálmamag zsír
it: Grassi di palmisti
nl: Palm pitvet, palmpitvet
pl: tłuszcz z ziaren palmowych, tłuszcz z ziarna palmowego

en: hydrogenated palm kernel oil, hydrogenated palm kernel
cs: ztužený palmojádrový olej
de: Palmkernöl hydriert
es: aceite de palmiste hidrogenado, aceite de palmiche hidrogenado, aceite de palmiste totalmente hidrogenado
fi: kovettu palmuydinöljy, kovetettu palmuydin
fr: huile de palmiste hydrogénée
hr: hidrogenirano ulje palminih koštica
it: olio di palmisti idrogenato
nl: Gehydrogeneerde palmpitolie
sv: härdat palmkärnolja, härdat palmkärna

en: fractionated palm kernel oil
de: Fraktioniertes Palmkernöl
es: aceite de semilla de palma fraccionado, aceite fraccionado de semilla de palma, aceite de semilla de palma fraccionada
fr: Huile de palmiste fractionnée
hr: frakcionirano ulje palminih koštica
it: Olio di palmisti frazionato

en: palm and palm kernel oil
de: Palm- und Palmkernöl, Palmöl und Palmkernöl
es: aceite de palma y palmiste
fi: palmu- ja palmuydinöljy
fr: huile de palme et de palmiste
hr: palma i ulje palminih koštica
hu: pálma- és pálmamagolaj, pálmaolaj és pálmamagolaj
it: olio di palma e di palmisto
nl: palmolie en palmkernolie

en: palm or palm kernel oil, palm oil or palm kernel oil, palm or palm kernel
de: Palmöl oder Palmkernöl, Palm- oder Palmkernöl
fi: palmu tai palmuydinöljy, palmuöljy tai palmuydinöljy, palmu tai palmuydin
fr: huile de palme ou de palmiste, huile de palme ou huile de palmiste, palme ou palmiste
hr: palmino ulje ili ulje palminih koštica
hu: pálma- vagy pálmamagolaj, pálmaolaj vagy pálmamagolaj
it: olio di palma o di palmisto
nl: palmolie of palmkernolie

en: pumpkin seed oil
ar: زيت بذور اليقطين
bg: олио от тиквени семки
ca: oli de carbassó
cs: dýňový olej
da: græskarkerneolie
de: Kürbiskern-Öl, Kürbiskernöl
eo: peponoleo
es: aceite de semillas de calabaza
eu: kuia-hazien olio
fa: تخمه کدو
fi: kurpitsansiemenöljy
fr: huile de pépins de courge
hr: bučino ulje
hu: tökmagolaj
hy: դդմի յուղ
it: olio di semi di zucca
ja: パンプキン・シード・オイル
jv: lenga wiji waluh
ko: 호박씨유
lt: moliūgų sėklų aliejus
pl: olej z pestek dyni
pt: óleo de semente de abóbora
ru: тыквенное масло
sl: bučno olje
sv: pumpafröolja
uk: гарбузова олія
zh: 施泰尔南瓜籽油

en: organic pumpkin seed oil
da: økologisk græskarkerneolie
de: Bio-Kürbiskernöl
fi: luomu kurpitsansiemenöljy
fr: huile de pépin de courge biologique
hr: organsko bučino ulje
hu: bio tökmagolaj
it: olio di semi di zucca biologico
nl: olie van biologische pompoenpitten
sv: ekologisk pumpafröolja

en: coconut oil, copra oil, copra, coconut vegetable oil
ar: زيت جوز الهند
bg: Кокосово олио, кокосово
bn: নারিকেল তেল
ca: Oli de coco, oli vegetal de coco, oli de copra, copra
cs: Kokosový olej
da: kokosolie
de: Kokosnussöl, Kokosöl
es: aceite de coco, aceite vegetal de coco
et: Kookosõli
eu: Koko olio
fa: روغن نارگیل
fi: Kookosöljy
fr: huile de coco, huile de noix de coco, huile de coprah, coprah, graisse de coprah, matière grasse de coco, graisse végétale de coprah, graisse végétale de coco, huile végétale de coco, huile végétale de coprah
ga: Aceite de coco
he: שמן קוקוס
hi: नारियल तेल
hr: kokosovo ulje
hu: kókuszolaj
id: Minyak kelapa
is: kókosolía
it: olio di cocco
ja: ヤシ油, ココナッツオイル
kn: ಕೊಬ್ಬರಿ ಎಣ್ಣೆ
ko: 야자유
lt: kokosų aliejus
lv: kokosriekstu eļļa
ml: വെളിച്ചെണ്ണ
mr: खोबरेल तेल
ms: Minyak kelapa
my: အုန်းဆီ
nb: kokosolje
nl: kokosolie
nn: kokosolje
os: Кокосы зети
pl: Olej kokosowy, olej roślinny kokosowy, oleje roślinne kokosowy
pt: óleo de coco
ro: Ulei de cocos
ru: Кокосовое масло, масло кокосовое
sa: नारिकेलतैलम्
si: පොල් තෙල්
sl: Kokosovo olje
sv: kokosolja
ta: தேங்காயெண்ணெய்
te: కొబ్బరి నూనె
tr: Hindistan cevizi yağı
uk: Кокосове масло
vi: Dầu dừa
zh: 椰子油

en: virgin coconut oil, raw coconut oil
de: Natives Kokosöl, Kokosöl nativ, unraffiniertes Kokosnussöl, Kokosnussöl unraffiniert, Natives Kokosnussöl, Kokosnussöl nativ, unraffiniertes Kokosöl, Kokosöl unraffiniert
es: Aceite virgen de coco, Aceite de coco virgen
fr: huile vierge de noix de coco, huile de coco vierge, Huile vierge de coco
hr: djevičansko kokosovo ulje
it: olio di cocco vergine
pl: olej kokosowy virgin

en: extra virgin coconut oil
es: aceite de coco extra virgen
fr: huile de coco extra vierge
hr: ekstra djevičansko kokosovo ulje, ekstradjevičansko kokosovo ulje
it: olio extravergine di cocco
pl: olej kokosowy extra virgin